Hawaii statutes.
§263-10 Hunting from aircraft; penalty.
(a) Any aeronaut or passenger who, while in flight in, across, or above the
State, intentionally kills or attempts to kill any birds or animals shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor and punished by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by
imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, state employees and independent contractors retained by the State
may, while in flight in, across, or above the State, intentionally kill or
attempt to kill any wildlife in furtherance of official state duties. [L 1923,
c 109, §13; RL 1925, §3903; RL 1935, §6986; RL 1945, §4933; RL 1955, §16-10;
HRS §263-10; am L 2016, c 111, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next